Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 2 Department of Community Health

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009, redesignated former Chapter 5A of Title 31 as present Chapter 2 of Title 31 and combined it with former Chapter 2 of Title 31.

Administrative rules and regulations.

General licensing and enforcement requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Chapter 111-8-25.

Personal care homes, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Chapter 111-8-62.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Case for Streamlining Emergency Declaration Authorities and Adapting Legal Requirements to Ever-Changing Public Health Threats,” see 67 Emory L.J. 397 (2018).

For article, “Do State Lines Make Public Health Emergencies Worse? Federal Versus State Control of Quarantine,” see 67 Emory L.J. 491 (2018).

31-2-1.
Legislative intent; grant of authority.

Given the growing concern and complexities of health issues in this state, it is the intent of the General Assembly to create a Department of Community Health dedicated to health issues. Illustrating, without limiting, the foregoing grant of authority, the department is empowered to:

Serve as the lead planning agency for all health issues in the state to remedy the current situation wherein the responsibility for health care policy, purchasing, planning, and regulation is spread among many different agencies and achieve determinations of Medicaid eligibility for inmates to attain services at long-term care facilities when he or she is being considered for parole;

Permit the state to maximize its purchasing power and to administer its operations in a manner so as to receive the maximum amount of federal financial participation available in expenditures of the department;

Minimize duplication and maximize administrative efficiency in the state’s health care systems by removing overlapping functions and streamlining uncoordinated programs;

Allow the state to develop a better health care infrastructure that is more responsive to the consumers it serves while improving access to and coverage for health care;

Focus more attention and departmental procedures on the issue of wellness, including diet, exercise, and personal responsibility;

Enter into or upon public or private property at reasonable times for the purpose of inspecting same to determine the presence of conditions deleterious to health or to determine compliance with applicable laws and rules, regulations, and standards thereunder; and

Promulgate and enforce rules and regulations for the licensing of medical facilities wherein abortion procedures under subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 16-12-141 are to be performed.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-5A-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-2-1

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-1/HB 214; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 3-1/SB 407.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added “and achieve determinations of Medicaid eligibility for inmates to attain services at long-term care facilities when he or she is being considered for parole” at the end of paragraph (1).

Editor’s notes.

The substance of the former Code section, pertaining to duty, functions, and powers of the former Department of Human Resources is now contained in the introductory language and paragraphs (6) through (18) of the present Code section. The former Code section was based on Code 1933, § 88-108, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 669, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 635, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 823, §§ 1, 2, and was repealed by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009.

Law reviews.

For article, “Putting the Community Back into the ‘Community Benefit’ Standard,” see 44 Ga. L. Rev. 375 (2010).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

31-2-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Community Health established under Code Section 31-2-3.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of community health established under Code Section 31-2-6.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health established under Code Section 31-2-4.

“Predecessor agency or unit” means the Department of Community Health, the Division of Public Health of the Department of Human Resources, and the Office of Regulatory Services of the Department of Human Resources.

“State health benefit plan” means the health insurance plan authorized under Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45 and Part 6 of Article 17 of Chapter 2 of Title 20.

“State Personnel Board” means the board established under Article IV, Section III of the Constitution.

History.

Code 1981, § 31-5A-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-2-2

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-2 as present Code Section 31-2-7.

31-2-3.
Board of Community Health reconstituted; powers, functions, and duties; terms of board members; vacancies; removal; chairperson; expenses.

There is reconstituted the Board of Community Health, as of July 1, 2009, which shall establish the general policy to be followed by the Department of Community Health. The powers, functions, and duties of the Board of Community Health as they existed on June 30, 2009, are transferred to the reconstituted Board of Community Health effective July 1, 2009. The board shall consist of nine members appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate.

Board members in office on June 30, 2009, shall serve out the remainder of their respective terms and successors to these board seats shall be appointed in accordance with this Code section. Thereafter, all succeeding appointments shall be for three-year terms from the expiration of the previous term.

Vacancies in office shall be filled by appointment by the Governor in the same manner as the appointment to the position on the board which becomes vacant, and the appointment shall be submitted to the Senate for confirmation at the next session of the General Assembly. An appointment to fill a vacancy other than by expiration of a term of office shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.

Members of the board may be removed from office under the same conditions for removal from office of members of professional licensing boards provided in Code Section 43-1-17.

There shall be a chairperson of the board elected by and from the membership of the board who shall be the presiding officer of the board.

The members of the board shall receive a per diem allowance and expenses as shall be set and approved by the Office of Planning and Budget in conformance with rates and allowances set for members of other state boards.

History.

Code 1981, § 31-5A-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1706, § 19; Code 1981, §

31-2-3

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228.

Cross references.

Rules and regulations as to sanitary requirements; inspections; unsanitary condition as nuisance, §

43-10-6

.

Creation of Board of Human Services, creation of position of commissioner of human services, and further provisions regarding general functions and powers of Department of Human Services, T. 49, C. 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-3 as present Code Section 31-2-8.

31-2-4.
Department’s powers, duties, functions, and responsibilities; divisions; directors; contracts for health benefits.

The Department of Community Health is re-created and established to perform the functions and assume the duties and powers exercised on June 30, 2009, by the Department of Community Health, the Division of Public Health of the Department of Human Resources, and the Office of Regulatory Services of the Department of Human Resources, unless specifically transferred to the Department of Human Services, and such department, division, and office shall be reconstituted as the Department of Community Health effective July 1, 2009. The department shall retain powers and responsibility with respect to the expenditure of any funds appropriated to the department including, without being limited to, funds received by the state pursuant to the settlement of the lawsuit filed by the state against certain tobacco companies, State of Georgia, et al. v. Philip Morris, Inc., et al., Civil Action #E-61692, V19/246 (Fulton County Superior Court, December 9, 1998).

On and after July 1, 2011, the functions, duties, and powers of the Department of Community Health relating to the former Division of Public Health of the Department of Human Resources shall be performed and exercised by the Department of Public Health pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-2. No power, function, responsibility, duty, or similar authority held by the Department of Community Health as of June 30, 2009, shall be diminished or lost due to the creation of the Department of Public Health.

The director of the Division of Public Health in office on June 30, 2009, and the director of the Office of Regulatory Services in office on June 30, 2009, shall become directors of the respective division or office which those predecessor agencies or units have become on and after July 1, 2009, and until such time as the commissioner appoints other directors of such divisions or units. The position of director of the Division of Public Health shall be abolished effective July 1, 2011.

Reserved.

The Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia is authorized to contract with the department for health benefits for members, employees, and retirees of the board of regents and the dependents of such members, employees, and retirees and for the administration of such health benefits. The department is also authorized to contract with the board of regents for such purposes.

In addition to its other powers, duties, and functions, the department:

Shall be the lead agency in coordinating and purchasing health care benefit plans for state and public employees, dependents, and retirees and may also coordinate with the board of regents for the purchase and administration of such health care benefit plans for its members, employees, dependents, and retirees;

Is authorized to plan and coordinate medical education and physician work force issues;

Shall investigate the lack of availability of health insurance coverage and the issues associated with the uninsured population of this state. In particular, the department is authorized to investigate the feasibility of creating and administering insurance programs for small businesses and political subdivisions of the state and to propose cost-effective solutions to reducing the numbers of uninsured in this state;

Is authorized to appoint a health care work force policy advisory committee to oversee and coordinate work force planning activities;

Is authorized to solicit and accept donations, contributions, and gifts and receive, hold, and use grants, devises, and bequests of real, personal, and mixed property on behalf of the state to enable the department to carry out its functions and purposes;

Is authorized to award grants, as funds are available, to hospital authorities, hospitals, and medical-legal partnerships for public health purposes, pursuant to Code Sections 31-7-94 and 31-7-94.1 and paragraph (11) of this subsection;

Shall make provision for meeting the cost of hospital care of persons eligible for public assistance to the extent that federal matching funds are available for such expenditures for hospital care. To accomplish this purpose, the department is authorized to pay from funds appropriated for such purposes the amount required under this paragraph into a trust fund account which shall be available for disbursement for the cost of hospital care of public assistance recipients. The commissioner, subject to the approval of the Office of Planning and Budget, on the basis of the funds appropriated in any year, shall estimate the scope of hospital care available to public assistance recipients and the approximate per capita cost of such care. Monthly payments into the trust fund for hospital care shall be made on behalf of each public assistance recipient and such payments shall be deemed encumbered for assistance payable. Ledger accounts reflecting payments into and out of the hospital care fund shall be maintained for each of the categories of public assistance established under Code Section 49-4-3. The balance of state funds in such trust fund for the payment of hospital costs in an amount not to exceed the amount of federal funds held in the trust fund by the department available for expenditure under this paragraph shall be deemed encumbered and held in trust for the payment of the costs of hospital care and shall be rebudgeted for this purpose on each quarterly budget required under the laws governing the expenditure of state funds. The state auditor shall audit the funds in the trust fund established under this paragraph in the same manner that any other funds disbursed by the department are audited;

Shall classify and license community living arrangements in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the department for the licensing and enforcement of licensing requirements for persons whose services are financially supported, in whole or in part, by funds authorized through the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities. To be eligible for licensing as a community living arrangement, the residence and services provided must be integrated within the local community. All community living arrangements licensed by the department shall be subject to the provisions of Code Sections 31-2-8 and 31-7-2.2. No person, business entity, corporation, or association, whether operated for profit or not for profit, may operate a community living arrangement without first obtaining a license or provisional license from the department. A license issued pursuant to this paragraph is not assignable or transferable. As used in this paragraph, the term “community living arrangement” means any residence, whether operated for profit or not, which undertakes through its ownership or management to provide or arrange for the provision of housing, food, one or more personal services, support, care, or treatment exclusively for two or more persons who are not related to the owner or administrator of the residence by blood or marriage;

Shall establish, by rule adopted pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” a schedule of fees for licensure activities for institutions and other health care related entities required to be licensed, permitted, registered, certificated, or commissioned by the department pursuant to Chapter 7, 13, 23, or 44 of this title, Chapter 5 of Title 26, paragraph (8) of this subsection, or Article 7 of Chapter 6 of Title 49. Such schedules shall be determined in a manner so as to help defray the costs incurred by the department, but in no event to exceed such costs, both direct and indirect, in providing such licensure activities. Such fees may be annually adjusted by the department but shall not be increased by more than the annual rate of inflation as measured by the Consumer Price Index, as reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. All fees paid thereunder shall be paid into the general funds of the State of Georgia. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the proceeds from all fees imposed pursuant to this paragraph be used to support and improve the quality of licensing services provided by the department;

May accept the certification or accreditation of an entity or program by a certification or accreditation body, in accordance with specific standards, as evidence of compliance by the entity or program with the substantially equivalent departmental requirements for issuance or renewal of a permit or provisional permit, provided that such certification or accreditation is established prior to the issuance or renewal of such permits. The department may not require an additional departmental inspection of any entity or program whose certification or accreditation has been accepted by the department, except to the extent that such specific standards are less rigorous or less comprehensive than departmental requirements. Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit either departmental inspections for violations of such standards or requirements or the revocation of or refusal to issue or renew permits, as authorized by applicable law, or for violation of any other applicable law or regulation pursuant thereto.

For purposes of this paragraph, the term:

“Entity or program” means an agency, center, facility, institution, community living arrangement, drug abuse treatment and education program, or entity subject to regulation by the department under Chapters 7, 13, 22, 23, and 44 of this title; Chapter 5 of Title 26; paragraph (8) of this subsection; and Article 7 of Chapter 6 of Title 49.

“Permit” means any license, permit, registration, certificate, or commission issued by the department pursuant to the provisions of the law cited in division (i) of this subparagraph;

Is authorized to approve medical-legal partnerships that comply with standards and guidelines established for such programs for purposes of determining eligibility for grants. The department shall seek input from legal services organizations, community health advocacy organizations, hospitals, diagnostic and treatment centers, and other primary and specialty health care providers in establishing such standards and guidelines.

For purposes of this paragraph, the term “medical-legal partnership” means a program conducted or established by a nonprofit entity through a collaboration pursuant to a written agreement between one or more medical service providers and one or more legal services programs, including those based within a law school, to provide legal services without charge to assist income-eligible individuals and their families in resolving legal matters or other needs that have an impact on the health of such individuals and families. Written agreements may include a memorandum of understanding or other agreement relating to the operations of the partnership and encompassing the rights and responsibilities of each party thereto. The medical service provider or providers may provide referrals of its patients to the legal services program or programs on matters that may potentially impact the health, health care, or the health care costs of a patient.

A medical-legal partnership that complies with the standards and guidelines established pursuant to this paragraph and has demonstrated the ability and experience to provide high quality patient centered legal services regarding legal matters or other needs that have an impact on the health of individuals and families shall be approved by the department.

This paragraph shall not be construed to require any medical-legal partnership or similar entity to seek or attain approval pursuant to this paragraph in order to operate;

In cooperation with the Department of Corrections and the State Board of Pardons and Paroles, shall establish and implement a Medicaid eligibility determination procedure so that inmates being considered for parole who are eligible for long-term care services may apply for Medicaid; and

Shall request federal approval for and facilitate the application of certificates of need for facilities capable of providing long-term care services, with Medicaid as the primary funding source, to inmates who are eligible for such services and funding upon his or her release from a public institution, as such term is defined in Code Section 49-4-31.

History.

Code 1981, § 31-5A-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1240, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1132, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-4; Code 1981 §

31-2-4

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1014, § 1/HB 994; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-2/HB 214; Ga. L. 2014, p. 397, § 1/SB 352; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 3-2/SB 407; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 31/SB 52; Ga. L. 2020, p. 95, § 2/HB 987.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted “and” at the end of division (d)(10)(B)(ii), substituted “; and” for the period at the end of subparagraph (d)(11)(D), and added paragraphs (d)(12) and (d)(13).

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted “and” at the end of subparagraph (d)(11)(D).

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, inserted “certificated,” in the first sentence of paragraph (d)(9) and inserted “certificate,” near the beginning of division (d)(10)(B)(ii).

Cross references.

Georgia Commission on Women, T. 50, C. 12, A. 5.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2(14)/SB 97, effective July 1, 2009, purported to substitute “State Personnel Administration” for “State Merit System of Personnel Administration” in former Code Section 31-5A-4, but that amendment was not given effect due to the redesignation and amendment by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “work force” was substituted for “workforce” in paragraph (d)(2) and “of” was deleted preceding “the amount required” in the second sentence of paragraph (d)(7).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-4 as present Code Section 31-2-9.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 04.08.20.03, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 03.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Hearings and petitions for rule-making, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Administration, Chapter 290-1-1.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

31-2-5.
Transfer of personnel and functions; conforming to federal standards of personnel administration; existing procedures, regulations, and agreements; rules adoption and implementation.

All persons employed in a predecessor agency or unit on June 30, 2009, shall, on July 1, 2009, become employees of the department. Such employees shall be subject to the employment practices and policies of the department on and after July 1, 2009, but the compensation and benefits of such transferred employees shall not be reduced as a result of such transfer. Employees who are subject to the rules of the State Personnel Board and who are transferred to the department shall retain all existing rights under such rules. Retirement rights of such transferred employees existing under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or other public retirement systems on June 30, 2009, shall not be impaired or interrupted by the transfer of such employees and membership in any such retirement system shall continue in the same status possessed by the transferred employees on June 30, 2009. Accrued annual and sick leave possessed by said employees on June 30, 2009, shall be retained by said employees as employees of the department.

The department shall conform to federal standards for a merit system of personnel administration in any respects necessary for receiving federal grants, and the board is authorized and empowered to effect such changes as may, from time to time, be necessary in order to comply with such standards.

The department is authorized to employ, on a full-time or part-time basis, such medical, supervisory, institutional, and other professional personnel and such clerical and other employees as may be necessary to discharge the duties of the department under this chapter. The department is also authorized to contract for such professional services as may be necessary.

Classified employees of the department under this chapter shall in all instances be employed and dismissed in accordance with rules of the State Personnel Board.

All personnel of the department are authorized to be members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia as provided in Chapter 2 of Title 47. All rights, credits, and funds in that retirement system which are possessed by state personnel transferred by provisions of this chapter to the department, or otherwise had by persons at the time of employment with the department, are continued and preserved, it being the intention of the General Assembly that such persons shall not lose any rights, credits, or funds to which they may be entitled prior to becoming employees of the department.

The department shall succeed to all rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders of the predecessor agency or unit which were in effect on June 30, 2009, or scheduled to go into effect on or after July 1, 2009, and which relate to the functions transferred to the department by this chapter. Such rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders shall remain in effect until amended, repealed, superseded, or nullified by proper authority or as otherwise provided by law. Rules of the department shall be adopted, promulgated, and implemented as provided in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” except that only rules promulgated pursuant to Chapter 6 of this title shall be subject to the provisions of Code Section 31-6-21.1.

The rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties of parties to contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions entered into before July 1, 2009, by any predecessor agency or unit and which pertain to the functions transferred to the department by this chapter shall continue to exist; and none of these rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties are impaired or diminished by reason of the transfer of the functions to the department. In all such instances, the Department of Community Health shall be substituted for the predecessor agency or unit, and the Department of Community Health shall succeed to the rights and duties under such contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions.

On July 1, 2009, the department shall receive custody of the state owned real property in the custody of the predecessor agency or unit on June 30, 2009, and which pertains to the functions transferred to the department by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, § 31-5A-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1240, § 2; Code 1981, §

31-2-5

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453 § 1-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-33/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-5 as present Code Section 31-2-10.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

31-2-6.
Commissioner of community health created; creation of divisions; allocation of functions.

There is created the position of commissioner of community health. The commissioner shall be the chief administrative officer of the department and shall be subject to appointment and removal by the Governor. Subject to the general policy established by the board, the commissioner shall supervise, direct, account for, organize, plan, administer, and execute the functions vested in the department.

There shall be created in the department such divisions as may be found necessary for its effective operation. The commissioner shall have the power to allocate and reallocate functions among the divisions within the department.

History.

Code 1981, § 31-5A-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-2-6

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 31/HB 142.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228, effective July 1, 2009, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-6 as present Code Section 31-2-11.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 54(e)/HB 142, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2011 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to subsection (b) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 31(1)/HB 142, was not given effect.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article, “Health: Department of Public Health,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-2-7.
Rules and regulations; variances and waivers to rules and regulations establishing licensure standards for facilities; exemption of classes of facilities from regulation.

The department is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to effect prevention, abatement, and correction of situations and conditions which, if not promptly checked, would militate against the health of the people of this state. Such rules and regulations shall be adapted to the purposes intended, within the purview of the powers and duties imposed upon the department by this chapter, and supersede conflicting rules, regulations, and orders adopted pursuant to the authority of Chapter 3 of this title.

The department upon application or petition may grant variances and waivers to specific rules and regulations which establish standards for facilities or entities regulated by the department as follows:

The department may authorize departure from the literal requirements of a rule or regulation by granting a variance upon a showing by the applicant or petitioner that the particular rule or regulation that is the subject of the variance request should not be applied as written because strict application would cause undue hardship. The applicant or petitioner additionally must show that adequate standards affording protection of health, safety, and care exist and will be met in lieu of the exact requirements of the rule or regulation in question;

The department may dispense entirely with the enforcement of a rule or regulation by granting a waiver upon a showing by the applicant or petitioner that the purpose of the rule or regulation is met through equivalent standards affording equivalent protection of health, safety, and care;

The department may grant waivers and variances to allow experimentation and demonstration of new and innovative approaches to delivery of services upon a showing by the applicant or petitioner that the intended protections afforded by the rule or regulation which is the subject of the request are met and that the innovative approach has the potential to improve service delivery;

Waivers or variances which affect an entire class of facilities may only be approved by the Board of Community Health and shall be for a time certain, as determined by the board. A notice of the proposed variance or waiver affecting an entire class of facilities shall be made in accordance with the requirements for notice of rule making in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act”; or

Variances or waivers which affect only one facility in a class may be approved or denied by the department and shall be for a time certain, as determined by the department. The department shall maintain a record of such action and shall make this information available to the board and all other persons who request it.

This subsection shall not apply to rules adopted by the department pursuant to Code Section 31-6-21.1.

The department may exempt classes of facilities from regulation when, in the department’s judgment, regulation would not permit the purpose intended or the class of facilities is subject to similar requirements under other rules and regulations. Such exemptions shall be provided in rules and regulations promulgated by the board.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-110, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-2-4

; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1592, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 791, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 569, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-2-9

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

31-2-7

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-4/HB 214.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1, effective July 1, 2009, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-7 as present Code Section 31-2-12.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214, effective July 1, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-7 as present Code Section 31-2A-8.

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 03.20.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).